Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1822
Mental incompetency of accused after crime commission; effect; death penalty; stay of execution.

(1) A person who becomes mentally incompetent after the commission of an offense shall not be tried for the offense until such disability is removed as provided in section 29-1823.

(2) If, after a verdict of guilty, but before judgment is pronounced, a defendant becomes mentally incompetent, then no judgment shall be given until such disability is removed.

(3) If a defendant is sentenced to death and, after judgment, but before execution of the sentence, such person becomes mentally incompetent, execution of the sentence shall be stayed until such disability is removed.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 454, p. 823;

R.S.1913, § 9098;

C.S.1922, § 10123;

C.S.1929, § 29-1821;

R.S.1943, § 29-1822;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 7;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 13;

Referendum 2016, No. 426;

Laws 2020, LB881, § 17.

District court has discretion to hold hearing voluntarily on mental competency of defendant to undergo sentence. State v. Saxon, 187 Neb. 338, 190 N.W.2d 854 (1971).

Insanity as a bar to the imposition of sentence presents a factual issue for the determination of the court. State v. Anderson, 186 Neb. 435, 183 N.W.2d 766 (1971).

Insanity as bar to imposition of sentence cannot be raised by habeas corpus. Sedlacek v. Hann, 156 Neb. 340, 56 N.W.2d 138 (1952).

This section imposes a duty on but does not go to the jurisdiction of the court. Sedlacek v. Greenholtz, 152 Neb. 386, 41 N.W.2d 154 (1950).

One who has become insane after the commission of a crime ought not to be tried for the offense during the continuance of the disability. Carlsen v. State, 129 Neb. 84, 261 N.W. 339 (1935).

Where insanity has not originated after commission of act, there is no requirement of trial of question of insanity. Walker v. State, 46 Neb. 25, 64 N.W. 357 (1895).